incubator/apertium-pes/dev/apertium-tg-fa.fa.dix
<pardef n="/VERBS__نشانید">
                        <e><par n="P__prefixes"/><p><l>نشانید</l><r>نشانیدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="V__چشید/ن__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__prefixes"/><p><l>نشانیده</l><r>نشانیدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><j/></r></p><par n="zwnj_or_space"/><par n="aV__/استن__vbser"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__imp__prefixes"/><p><l>نشانان</l><r>نشانیدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
                        <e><par n="P__imp__prefixes"/><p><l>نشان</l><r>نشانیدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p><par n="V__/بچش[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__njprefixes"/><p><l>نشان</l><r>نشانیدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/></r></p><par n="V__چش/[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__jprefixes"/><p><l>نشان</l><r>نشانیدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="V__چش/[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>

</pardef>
<pardef n="/VERBS__نشاند">
                        <e><par n="P__prefixes"/><p><l>نشاند</l><r>نشاندن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="V__چشید/ن__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__prefixes"/><p><l>نشانده</l><r>نشاندن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><j/></r></p><par n="zwnj_or_space"/><par n="aV__/استن__vbser"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__imp__prefixes"/><p><l>نشانان</l><r>نشاندن<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
                        <e><par n="P__imp__prefixes"/><p><l>نشان</l><r>نشاندن<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p><par n="V__/بچش[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__njprefixes"/><p><l>نشان</l><r>نشاندن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/></r></p><par n="V__چش/[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__jprefixes"/><p><l>نشان</l><r>نشاندن<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="V__چش/[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>

</pardef>
<pardef n="/VERBS__نشاست">
                        <e><par n="P__prefixes"/><p><l>نشاست</l><r>نشاستن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="V__چشید/ن__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__prefixes"/><p><l>نشاسته</l><r>نشاستن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><j/></r></p><par n="zwnj_or_space"/><par n="aV__/استن__vbser"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__imp__prefixes"/><p><l>نشانان</l><r>نشاستن<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
                        <e><par n="P__imp__prefixes"/><p><l>نشان</l><r>نشاستن<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p><par n="V__/بچش[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__njprefixes"/><p><l>نشان</l><r>نشاستن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/></r></p><par n="V__چش/[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__jprefixes"/><p><l>نشان</l><r>نشاستن<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="V__چش/[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>

</pardef>
<pardef n="/VERBS__نازید">
                        <e><par n="P__prefixes"/><p><l>نازید</l><r>نازیدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="V__چشید/ن__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__prefixes"/><p><l>نازیده</l><r>نازیدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><j/></r></p><par n="zwnj_or_space"/><par n="aV__/استن__vbser"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__imp__prefixes"/><p><l>نازان</l><r>نازیدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
                        <e><par n="P__imp__prefixes"/><p><l>ناز</l><r>نازیدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p><par n="V__/بچش[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__njprefixes"/><p><l>ناز</l><r>نازیدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/></r></p><par n="V__چش/[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__jprefixes"/><p><l>ناز</l><r>نازیدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="V__چش/[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>

</pardef>
<pardef n="/VERBS__مرد">
                        <e><par n="P__prefixes"/><p><l>مرد</l><r>مردن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="V__چشید/ن__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__prefixes"/><p><l>مرده</l><r>مردن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><j/></r></p><par n="zwnj_or_space"/><par n="aV__/استن__vbser"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__imp__prefixes"/><p><l>میران</l><r>مردن<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
                        <e><par n="P__imp__prefixes"/><p><l>میر</l><r>مردن<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p><par n="V__/بچش[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__njprefixes"/><p><l>میر</l><r>مردن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/></r></p><par n="V__چش/[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__jprefixes"/><p><l>میر</l><r>مردن<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="V__چش/[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>

</pardef>
<pardef n="/VERBS__مانست">
                        <e><par n="P__prefixes"/><p><l>مانست</l><r>مانستن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="V__چشید/ن__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__prefixes"/><p><l>مانسته</l><r>مانستن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><j/></r></p><par n="zwnj_or_space"/><par n="aV__/استن__vbser"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__imp__prefixes"/><p><l>مانان</l><r>مانستن<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
                        <e><par n="P__imp__prefixes"/><p><l>مان</l><r>مانستن<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p><par n="V__/بچش[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__njprefixes"/><p><l>مان</l><r>مانستن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/></r></p><par n="V__چش/[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__jprefixes"/><p><l>مان</l><r>مانستن<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="V__چش/[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>

</pardef>
<pardef n="/VERBS__ماند">
                        <e><par n="P__prefixes"/><p><l>ماند</l><r>ماندن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="V__چشید/ن__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__prefixes"/><p><l>مانده</l><r>ماندن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><j/></r></p><par n="zwnj_or_space"/><par n="aV__/استن__vbser"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__imp__prefixes"/><p><l>مانان</l><r>ماندن<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
                        <e><par n="P__imp__prefixes"/><p><l>مان</l><r>ماندن<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p><par n="V__/بچش[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__njprefixes"/><p><l>مان</l><r>ماندن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/></r></p><par n="V__چش/[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__jprefixes"/><p><l>مان</l><r>ماندن<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="V__چش/[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>

</pardef>
<pardef n="/VERBS__مالید">
                        <e><par n="P__prefixes"/><p><l>مالید</l><r>مالیدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="V__چشید/ن__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__prefixes"/><p><l>مالیده</l><r>مالیدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><j/></r></p><par n="zwnj_or_space"/><par n="aV__/استن__vbser"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__imp__prefixes"/><p><l>مالان</l><r>مالیدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
                        <e><par n="P__imp__prefixes"/><p><l>مال</l><r>مالیدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p><par n="V__/بچش[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__njprefixes"/><p><l>مال</l><r>مالیدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/></r></p><par n="V__چش/[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>
                        <e><par n="P__jprefixes"/><p><l>مال</l><r>مالیدن<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="V__چش/[چشیدن]__vblex"/></e>

</pardef>

                            <e lm="مالیدن"><i/><par n="/VERBS__مالید"/></e>
                            <e lm="ماندن"><i/><par n="/VERBS__ماند"/></e>
                            <e lm="ماندن"><i/><par n="/VERBS__ماند"/></e>
                            <e lm="مانستن"><i/><par n="/VERBS__مانست"/></e>
                            <e lm="مردن"><i/><par n="/VERBS__مرد"/></e>
                            <e lm="نازیدن"><i/><par n="/VERBS__نازید"/></e>
                            <e lm="نشاستن"><i/><par n="/VERBS__نشاست"/></e>
                            <e lm="نشانیدن"><i/><par n="/VERBS__نشانید"/></e>
                            <e lm="نشاندن"><i/><par n="/VERBS__نشاند"/></e>
